Massachusetts, session 194th, H1726.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the “No Harm No Foul Act.”
SECTION 2. Section 34 of chapter 94C is hereby amended by adding a sixth paragraph,
viz.,
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any complaint for simple possession of psilocybin (i.e.,
not with the intent to distribute), may, in the absence of any indication that the offense caused
any visible harm to the health and safety of any other person, be dismissed upon a finding by the
court that at the time of the alleged offense the defendant (1) was over 21 years of age, (2) was
not operating a motor vehicle, and (3) endangered no children.
of 1